West Virginia, session 2025, HB2735.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. PREVENTION AND CONTROL OF COMMUNICABLE AND OTHER INFECTIOUS DISEASES. §16-3-14. Establishing natural immunity as an equal or preferred treatment method to vaccine immunization. All persons who have contracted a communicable or infectious disease and who have obtained natural immunity shall be classified as fully vaccinated, regardless of whether or not that person has obtained a vaccine for the illness before or after he or she contracted it. All persons who have received antibodies as a result of contracting a communicable or infectious disease shall also be classified as fully vaccinated. All persons who have natural immunity or antibodies to any communicable or infectious illness shall be treated as equal or preferred to those who have vaccine induced immunity.